Massachusetts, session 194th, H3262.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 4 of Chapter 62 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
paragraph (b) and inserting in place thereof the following:-
(b) Part B taxable income shall be taxed at the rate of 6.0 per cent for tax years beginning
on or after January 1, 2025.
SECTION 2. Subparagraph (1) of paragraph (b) of part B of section 3 of chapter 62 of the
General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out
clause (A) and inserting in place thereof the following clause:-
(A) a personal exemption of $6,600 for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025,
For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, the personal exemption shall be:
(i) the exemption in the previous year plus $275 if the inflation-adjusted growth in baseline taxes
in the fiscal year ending the June 30 of the previous year exceeds 2.5 per cent and the inflation-
adjusted change in baseline taxes for each consecutive 3 month period reported by the
of 3

commissioner between August and December of the previous year is greater than 0; or (ii) the
personal exemption in effect for the prior year. On or before October 15 of each year, the
commissioner shall submit a report to the secretary of administration, the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on revenue providing a preliminary
statement of the personal exemption for taxable years beginning on or after the following
January 1. On or before December 15, the commissioner shall make a final statement of the
personal exemption for the following year to the same recipients.
SECTION 3. Subparagraph (1A) of said paragraph (b) of said part B of said section 3 of
said chapter 62, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out clause (A) and inserting in
place thereof the following clause:-
(A) a personal exemption of $10,200 for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025,
For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, the personal exemption shall be:
(i) the exemption in the previous year plus $425 if the inflation-adjusted growth in baseline taxes
in the fiscal year ending the June 30 of the previous year exceeds 2.5 per cent and the inflation-
adjusted change in baseline taxes for each consecutive 3 month period reported by the
commissioner between August and December of the previous year is greater than 0; or (ii) the
personal exemption in effect for the prior year. On or before October 15 of each year, the
commissioner shall submit a report to the secretary of administration, the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on revenue providing a preliminary
statement of the personal exemption for taxable years beginning on or after the following
January 1. On or before December 15, the commissioner shall make a final statement of the
personal exemption for the following year to the same recipients.
of 3

SECTION 4. Subparagraph (2) of said paragraph (b) of said part B of said section 3 of
said chapter 62, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out clause (A) and inserting in
place thereof the following clause:-
(A) a personal exemption of $13,200 for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025,
For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, the personal exemption shall be:
(i) the exemption in the previous year plus $550 if the inflation-adjusted growth in baseline taxes
in the fiscal year ending the June 30 of the previous year exceeds 2.5 per cent and the inflation-
adjusted change in baseline taxes for each consecutive 3 month period reported by the
commissioner between August and December of the previous year is greater than 0; or (ii) the
personal exemption in effect for the prior year. On or before October 15 of each year, the
commissioner shall submit a report to the secretary of administration, the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on revenue providing a preliminary
statement of the personal exemption for taxable years beginning on or after the following
January 1. On or before December 15, the commissioner shall make a final statement of the
personal exemption for the following year to the same recipients.
of 3